Arkansas, session 2025, HB1937.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly intends for this act to:
(1) Be remedial; and
(2) Clarify the law.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1110(a), concerning the valuation of
mineral rights for purposes of property taxes, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) As used in this section:
(A) “Oil well Well” means a producing unit well or well
that produces:
(i) Only liquid hydrocarbons;
(ii) Liquid hydrocarbons associated with the
*JLL308*
04-03-2025 11:07:56 JLL308

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1937
production of gas; or
(iii) Gas associated with the production of liquid
hydrocarbons;
(iv) Natural gas; or
(v) Any combination of oil, gas, and other
hydrocarbons; and
(B) “Production equipment” means all piping and other
equipment of an oil a well from the bottom of the casing to and including the
sales valve at the tank battery or sales meter.
(2) The county assessor shall assess all producing mineral
interests in the county.
(3)(A) The county assessor shall assess the mineral interests in
the land separate from the fee simple interest in the land when the:
(i) Mineral interests in the land are held by one
(1) or more persons that are different from the person or persons holding the
fee simple interest; and
(ii) County assessor is advised of the separate
holdings by the recording of a deed in the county recorder's office.
(B) When subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section applies, a
sale of the mineral interests for nonpayment of taxes shall not affect the
title to the land itself, nor shall a sale of the land for nonpayment of
taxes affect the title to the mineral interests.
(4)(A) The county assessor shall assess all production equipment
as real property.
(B)(i) Except as stated under subdivision (a)(4)(B)(ii) of
this section, when assessing the value of production equipment, the county
assessor shall assess the production equipment at a value of one dollar
($1.00) per foot.
(ii) Any portion of the casing in a well that has
been rendered inoperable for producing oil or gas by a cement or mechanical
plug shall not be subject to taxation.
(5) If an oil a well reported production in a prior year and
reports an annual increase in average daily production, the annual increase
in average daily production shall be assessed as newly discovered property
only if the annual increase in average daily production is solely
attributable to new production from a geologic zone or horizon that was not
04-03-2025 11:07:56 JLL308

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1937
produced in a prior year from the existing oil well.
(6)(A) In calculating the working interest-assessed value of an
oil a well, the county assessor shall apply a uniform expense allowance per
barrel of oil or one thousand (1,000) cubic feet of gas produced without
regard to the average daily production of the oil well.
(B) The expense allowance under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of
this section shall be based as nearly as practicable on actual expenses per
barrel of oil or one thousand (1,000) cubic feet of gas produced.
(7) In assessing the value of an oil a well based on an income
approach, the income shall be based on the actual average price per barrel of
oil or one thousand (1,000) cubic feet of gas in Arkansas during the
immediately preceding calendar year.
(8) All formulas, valuation tables, and guidance that are
published or provided to the county assessors by the Assessment Coordination
Division to be used in the valuation and appraisal of mineral rights for ad
valorem tax purposes shall comply with the requirements of this section.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective for
assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/Jean















04-03-2025 11:07:56 JLL308